Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 2. HEALTH

SUBTITLE B. HEALTH PROGRAMS

CHAPTER 45. DISTRIBUTION OF CHILD PASSENGER SAFETY SEAT SYSTEMS

Sec. 45.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "child passenger safety seat system" has the meaning assigned by Section 545.412, Transportation Code.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 311, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1993. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 30.203, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 45.002. CHILD PASSENGER SAFETY SEAT SYSTEM PROGRAM. (a) The department may establish a program to distribute child passenger safety seat systems to indigent persons in this state.

(b) A program established under this section may distribute new or used child passenger safety seat systems that have been donated to the department for distribution.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 311, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Sec. 45.003. RULES. The executive commissioner may adopt rules governing eligibility for a child passenger safety seat system from the program established under Section 45.002.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 311, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0169, eff. April 2, 2015.